Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.07.925

Chapter supplemental—Application of other laws.

This chapter shall be regarded as supplemental and additional to the powers conferred on the authority by other laws. The issuance of bonds and refunding bonds under this chapter need not comply with requirements of any other laws applicable to the issuance of bonds.

[ 2007 c 36 s 13.]